Florida, session 2026, HB101.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 316.21275, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb101-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 101 2026
to read:
316.21275 Operation of a UTV on certain roadways.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Direct supervision" means a person is in the adjacent
front passenger seat of the UTV being operated.
(b) "Utility terrain vehicle" or "UTV" means a vehicle
less than 70 inches in width which has at least two seats
allowing passengers to sit in a side-by-side manner, is operated
by foot controls and a steering wheel, and is equipped with
headlamps, stop lamps, turn signals, tail lamps, rearview
mirrors, a windshield, seat belts, and a horn.
(2) A UTV may be operated during all hours.
(3) A UTV may be operated only upon:
(a) A two-lane county road with a posted speed limit of
less than 55 miles per hour which has been designated for UTV
use by a county; or
(b) A two-lane municipal street with a posted speed limit
of less than 55 miles per hour which has been designated for UTV
use by a municipality.

Before making such designation, the responsible county or
municipality must first determine that a UTV may safely travel
on or cross the public road or street, considering factors
including the speed, volume, and character of motor vehicle
traffic using the road or street.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb101-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 101 2026
(4) A person may operate a UTV on the State Highway System
only when necessary to cross the highway at an angle of
approximately 90 degrees to the direction of the roadway and at
a place where a quick and safe crossing can be made. The
Department of Transportation may prohibit the operation of UTVs
on any road in its jurisdiction if it determines that such
prohibition is necessary in the interest of safety.
(5) A person may operate a UTV only if he or she possesses
a driver license pursuant to s. 322.18, or the person possesses
a learner's driver license pursuant to s. 322.1615 and is under
the direct supervision of a licensed driver.
(6) The owner or operator of a UTV must comply with all of
the following requirements and regulations:
(a) Obey traffic regulations enumerated in this chapter
and operate his or her UTV with due care.
(b) Provide proof of ownership under chapter 317 upon
request of a law enforcement officer.
(c) Fulfill all insurance requirements pursuant to ss.
324.022 and 627.736.
(d) Ensure that the UTV has the proper license plate
pursuant to s. 320.0847.
(e) Maintain the registration certificate or a copy
thereof in the UTV pursuant to s. 320.0605.
(7) A county or municipality may enact an ordinance
regarding UTV operation and equipment which is more restrictive
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb101-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 101 2026
than those requirements enumerated in this section.
(8) A county or municipality may prohibit the operation of
a UTV on any road or street under its jurisdiction if the
governing body of such county or municipality determines that
such prohibition is necessary in the interest of safety.
(9) A violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic
infraction, punishable as a nonmoving violation, as provided in
chapter 318.
Section 2. Section 320.0847, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
320.0847 Mini truck, utility terrain vehicle, and low-
speed vehicle license plates.—
(1) The department shall issue a license plate to the
owner or lessee of any vehicle registered as a low-speed vehicle
as defined in s. 320.01, or a mini truck as defined in s.
320.01, or a utility terrain vehicle as defined in s.
316.21275(1) upon payment of the appropriate license taxes and
fees prescribed in s. 320.08.
(2) The license plate for a low-speed vehicle, or mini
truck, or utility terrain vehicle must shall comply with the
provisions of s. 320.06.
Section 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb101-00